Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.20.2892 and 2021 c 240 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever the official records of the department show that a person has committed a traffic infraction for a moving violation on three or more occasions within a one-year period, or on four or more occasions within a two-year period, the department must suspend the license of the driver for a period of 60 days and establish a period of probation for one ((calendar)) year to begin when the suspension ends, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Prior to reinstatement of a license, the person must complete a safe driving course as recommended by the department.(2) At any time after the department provides notice of a pending suspension under subsection (1) of this section, a person may complete the safe driving course mandated under subsection (1) of this section. The department must terminate a suspension or pending suspension prior to the expiration of the 60-day period when the department receives notice that the person has completed the safe driving course, provided applicable requirements under RCW 46.20.311 have been met and any other applicable licensing fees have been paid. The department must establish a period of probation for one year to begin the day the suspension or pending suspension is terminated. A suspension or pending suspension may only be terminated early once every five years under this subsection.(3) During ((the))a period of probation, the person must not be convicted of any additional traffic infractions for moving violations. Any traffic infraction for a moving violation committed during the period of probation shall result in an additional 30-day suspension to run consecutively with any suspension already being served. A person is not eligible for early reinstatement under subsection (2) of this section for a probation violation that occurs during the period of probation.(((2)))(4) When a person has committed a traffic infraction for a moving violation on two occasions within a one-year period or three occasions within a two-year period, the department shall send the person a notice that an additional infraction will result in suspension of the person's license for a period of 60 days.(((3)))(5) The department may not charge a reissue fee at the end of the term of suspension under this section.(((4)))(6) For purposes of this section, multiple traffic infractions issued during or as the result of a single traffic stop constitute one occasion.Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.311 and 2021 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW.(c) If the suspension is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the substance use disorder agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the substance use disorder agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking reinstatement. The department may waive the requirement for written verification under this subsection if it determines to its satisfaction that a device previously verified as having been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person is still installed and functioning or as permitted by RCW 46.20.720(8). If, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, the department determines that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer installed or functioning as required, the department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides notice issued by a company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.(e)(i) Except as provided in RCW 46.20.2892(((3)))(5), the department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of ((seventy-five dollars))$75.(ii) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be ((one hundred seventy dollars))$170.(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265.(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount of ((seventy-five dollars))$75.(ii) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be ((one hundred seventy dollars))$170. If the revocation is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the substance use disorder agency or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the substance use disorder agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device, the department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person applying for a new license. The department may waive the requirement for written verification under this subsection if it determines to its satisfaction that a device previously verified as having been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person is still installed and functioning or as permitted by RCW 46.20.720(8). If, following issuance of a new license, the department determines, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive until the department has received written verification from an interlock provider that a functioning interlock is installed.(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of ((seventy-five dollars))$75.(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be ((one hundred seventy dollars))$170.(4) When the department reinstates a person's driver's license following a suspension, revocation, or denial under RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055, and the person is entitled to full day-for-day credit under RCW 46.20.3101(4) or 46.61.5055(9)(b)(ii) for an additional restriction arising from the same incident, the department shall impose no additional reissue fees under subsection (1)(e)(ii), (2)(b)(ii), or (3)(b) of this section associated with the additional restriction.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect April 1, 2026.--- END ---